Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 34 O.S. 2021, Section 8, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 364, O.S.L. 2024 (34 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 8) is amended to read as follows:


Section 8. A. When a citizen or citizens desire to circulate a


petition initiating a proposition of any nature, whether to become a


statute law or an amendment to the Constitution, or for the purpose


of invoking a referendum upon legislative enactments, such citizen


or citizens shall, when such petition is prepared, and before the


same is circulated or signed by electors, file a true and exact copy


of same in the office of the Secretary of State and shall at the



Req. No. 1012 Page 1


same time file a separate ballot title, which shall not be part of


or printed on the petition.


B. It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to cause to


be published, in at least one newspaper of general circulation in


the state, a notice of such filing and the apparent sufficiency or


insufficiency of the petition, and shall include notice that any


citizen or citizens of the state may file a protest as to the


constitutionality of the petition, by a written notice to the


Supreme Court and to the proponent or proponents filing the


petition. Any such protest must be filed within ninety (90) days


after publication. A copy of the protest shall be filed with the


Secretary of State.


C. Upon the filing of a protest to the petition, the Supreme


Court shall then fix a day, not less than ten (10) business days


thereafter, at which time it will hear testimony and arguments for


and against the sufficiency of such petition.


D. A protest filed by anyone hereunder may, if abandoned by the


party filing same, be revived within five (5) business days by any


other citizen. After such hearing the Supreme Court shall decide


whether such petition is in the form required by the statutes. If


the Court is at the time adjourned, the Chief Justice shall


immediately convene the same for such hearing. No objection to the


sufficiency shall be considered unless it has been made and filed as


herein provided.

Req. No. 1012 Page 2


E. Signature-gathering Deadline for Initiative Petitions. When


an initiative petition has been filed in the office of the Secretary


of State and all appeals, protests and rehearings have been resolved


or the period for such has expired, the Secretary of State shall set


the date for circulation of signatures for the petition to begin but


in no event shall the date be less than fifteen (15) days nor more


than thirty (30) days from the date when all appeals, protests and


rehearings have been resolved or have expired. Notification shall


be sent to the proponents specifying the date on which circulation


of the petition shall begin and that the signatures are due within


ninety (90) days of the date set. Any person who circulates the


petition to collect signatures shall be a registered voter in this


state and shall display a conspicuous notice in any location where


the person is collecting signatures whether the person is being paid


to circulate the petition and if so, by what person or entity. Each


elector shall sign his or her name and legibly print his or her


name, birth date and address associated with his or her Oklahoma


voter registration record. Any petition not filed in accordance


with this provision shall not be considered. The proponents of an


initiative petition, any time before the final submission of


signatures, may withdraw the initiative petition upon written


notification to the Secretary of State.


F. Signature-gathering Deadline for Referendum Petitions. All


signed signatures supporting a referendum petition shall be filed

Req. No. 1012 Page 3


with the Secretary of State not later than ninety (90) days after


the adjournment of the legislative session in which the measure,


which is the subject of the referendum petition, was enacted.


G. The proponents of a referendum or an initiative petition may


terminate the circulation period any time during the ninety-day


circulation period by certifying to the Secretary of State that:


1. All signed petitions have already been filed with the


Secretary of State;


2. No more petitions are in circulation; and


3. The proponents will not circulate any more petitions.


If the Secretary of State receives such a certification from the


proponents, the Secretary of State shall begin the counting and


review process.


H. When the signed copies of a petition pamphlet are timely


filed, the Secretary of State shall file a copy of the proponent’s


ballot title with the Attorney General and, after conducting a count


and review of the filed, signed petition pamphlets, the Secretary of


State shall certify to the Supreme Court of the state:


1. The total number of signatures counted pursuant to


procedures set forth in this title; and


2. The total number of votes cast for the state office


receiving the highest number of votes cast at the last general


election.



Req. No. 1012 Page 4


The Supreme Court shall make the determination of the numerical


sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures counted and reviewed


by the Secretary of State.


I. Upon order of the Supreme Court it shall be the duty of the


Secretary of State to forthwith cause to be published, in at least


one newspaper of general circulation in the state, a notice of the


filing of the signed petitions and the apparent sufficiency or


insufficiency thereof, and shall also publish the text of the ballot


title as reviewed and approved or, if applicable, as rewritten by


the Attorney General pursuant to the provisions of subsection D of


Section 9 of this title and notice that any citizen or citizens of


the state may file an objection to the count made by the Secretary


of State, by a written notice to the Supreme Court and to the


proponent or proponents filing the petition. Any such objection


must be filed within ninety (90) days after publication and must


relate only to the validity or number of the signatures or a


challenge to the ballot title. A copy of the objection to the count


or ballot title shall be filed with the Supreme Court, the Attorney


General and the Secretary of State.


J. Upon appeal and if ordered or directed by the Supreme Court,


the Secretary of State shall deliver the bound volumes of signatures


to the Supreme Court.


K. Upon the filing of an objection to the signature count or


ballot title, the Supreme Court shall resolve the objection with

Req. No. 1012 Page 5


dispatch. The Supreme Court shall adopt rules to govern proceedings


to apply to the challenge of a measure on the grounds that the


proponents failed to gather sufficient signatures.


L. If in the opinion of the Supreme Court, any objection to the


count or protest to the petition is frivolous, the Court may impose


appropriate sanctions, including an award of costs and attorneys


fees to either party as the Court deems equitable.


M. Whenever reference is made in this act to the Supreme Court,


such reference shall include the members of the Supreme Court, or


any officer constitutionally designated to perform the duties herein


prescribed.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-399 TEK 1/16/2025 3:49:34 PM





















Req. No. 1012 Page 6